Utah statutes.
59-1-1003.   Penalty waiver.

The commission shall waive penalties on taxpayer underpayments that are attributable to incorrect written advice obtained from the commission unless the taxpayer has given the commission inaccurate or insufficient information.



Enacted by Chapter 35, 1991 General Session

